Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 490, O.S.L.


2025 (69 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 508), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 508. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury


a revolving fund to be designated as the “Preserving and Advancing


County Transportation Fund” (PACT Fund). The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies directed for deposit to the fund by law


including, but not limited to, apportionments made pursuant to


paragraph 10 11 of subsection B of Section 1004 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. All monies accruing to the credit of said the

Req. No. 3479 Page 1


fund are hereby appropriated and may be allocated, budgeted, and


expended pursuant to subsection B of this section. Expenditures


from said the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State


Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


B. 1. Two-thirds (2/3) of the monies deposited to the credit


of the PACT Fund shall be allocated as follows:


a. to the various counties in a manner that increases


accounts for a county’s population, traffic volume,


military-related impacts, lane-mile burdens, presence


of major federal installations, and per county mile


highway construction and maintenance ratio, with the


goal of increasing such ratio to a target ratio of


Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) per county road


mile, prioritizing counties impacted most by the


factors provided for in this subparagraph and with the


lowest such ratio, until all of the various counties


reach such target ratio, and


b. any remaining amounts as follows:


(1) fifty percent (50%) shall be allocated to the


various counties in the proportion which the


certified county road miles of each county bears


to the sum of county road miles in the state, and

Req. No. 3479 Page 2


(2) fifty percent (50%) shall be allocated to the


various counties in the proportion which the


number of county bridges in each county according


to the most recent ODOT Department of


Transportation Bridge Summary Report for County


Bridges bears to the total sum of county bridges


in the state according to such report.


Each county treasurer shall deposit such funds to the county’s


county highway fund and such funds shall be used for constructing


and maintaining the county highway system.


2. One-third (1/3) of the monies deposited to the credit of the


PACT Fund shall be used as necessary for the reconstruction of


county bridges on the portion of the county highway system defined


as major collector routes in accordance with the provisions of


Section 654 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title. Prior


to any funds for such projects being allocated, the counties shall


submit the proposed projects to the Department of Transportation,


which shall evaluate and confirm whether the proposed projects are


in accordance with the criteria provided for in this subsection.


Bridges proposed for reconstruction will be generally evaluated


based on the state of project innovation, readiness, structural


adequacy, safety, serviceability, functional obsolescence,


essentiality for public use, structural deficiency ranking as


captured in the most recent ODOT Department of Transportation Bridge

Req. No. 3479 Page 3


Summary Report at the time of submission, and special reductions for


characteristics such as detour length, traffic safety features, and


current school bus routes. Upon confirmation by the Department of


Transportation that a proposed project is in accordance with the


criteria provided for in this subsection, funds shall be allocated


to the county for use in such project.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3479 MSBB 1/15/2026 1:01:43 PM























Req. No. 3479 Page 4